Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.323.100

Joint school districts—Levy of tax—Remittance to district treasurer.

Upon receipt of the aforesaid certificate, it shall be the duty of the county legislative authority of each county to levy on all taxable property of that part of the joint school district which lies within the county a tax sufficient to raise the amount necessary to meet the county's proportionate share of the estimated expenditures of the joint district, as shown by the certificate of the educational service district superintendent of the district to which the joint school district belongs. Such taxes shall be levied and collected in the same manner as other taxes are levied and collected, and the proceeds thereof shall be forwarded monthly by the treasurer of each county, other than the county to which the joint district belongs, to the treasurer of the county to which such district belongs and shall be placed to the credit of said district. The treasurer of the county to which a joint school district belongs is hereby declared to be the treasurer of such district.

[ 1994 c 301 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 275 s 99; 1969 ex.s. c 176 s 136; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.57.300. Prior: 1947 c 266 s 32; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4693-51. Formerly RCW 28A.315.440, 28A.57.300, 28.57.300.]

NOTES:

Rights preserved—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 176: See notes following RCW 28A.310.010.